dev/mt_brokenplurals/appendix1.fat.dix
  <!-- tertuqa; t; 2 -->
    <pardef n="t/ertuqa__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ertuqa</l>
          <r>ertuqa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rietaq</l>
          <r>ertuqa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- isfar; ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="/isfar__adj_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>isfar</l>
          <r>isfar<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sofor</l>
          <r>isfar<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- sined; s; 3 -->
    <pardef n="s/ined__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ined</l>
          <r>ined<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nied</l>
          <r>ined<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>niedi</l>
          <r>ined<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ġebla; ġeb; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ġeb/la__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>la<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>la<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- blokka; blok; 2 -->
    <pardef n="blok/ka__adj_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ka</l>
          <r>ka<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ok</l>
          <r>ka<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- balla; bal; 2 -->
    <pardef n="bal/la__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>la<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>al</l>
          <r>la<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- bodbod; b; 2 -->
    <pardef n="b/odbod__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odbod</l>
          <r>odbod<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dabad</l>
          <r>odbod<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ħalla; ħal; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ħal/la__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>la<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>la<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- mazza; maz; 2 -->
    <pardef n="maz/za__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>za</l>
          <r>za<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ez</l>
          <r>za<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ponta; pon; 2 -->
    <pardef n="pon/ta__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ta</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ot</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- musmar; m; 2 -->
    <pardef n="m/usmar__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>usmar</l>
          <r>usmar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>siemer</l>
          <r>usmar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- dorbies; d; 3 -->
    <pardef n="d/orbies__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orbies</l>
          <r>orbies<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rabes</l>
          <r>orbies<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>riebes</l>
          <r>orbies<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- zalza; z; 2 -->
    <pardef n="z/alza__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alza</l>
          <r>alza<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lazi</l>
          <r>alza<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- troffa; tr; 2 -->
    <pardef n="tr/offa__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>offa</l>
          <r>offa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uf</l>
          <r>offa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- pinta; pin; 2 -->
    <pardef n="pin/ta__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ta</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- palla; pal; 2 -->
    <pardef n="pal/la__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>la<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>la<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- btala; bta; 2 -->
    <pardef n="bta/la__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>la<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jjel</l>
          <r>la<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- qallut; q; 2 -->
    <pardef n="q/allut__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>allut</l>
          <r>allut<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lalet</l>
          <r>allut<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ċenċiela; ċe; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ċe/nċiela__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nċiela</l>
          <r>nċiela<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ċniel</l>
          <r>nċiela<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- reġina; r; 2 -->
    <pardef n="r/eġina__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eġina</l>
          <r>eġina<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ġejjen</l>
          <r>eġina<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- kaxxa; kax; 2 -->
    <pardef n="kax/xa__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>xa</l>
          <r>xa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ex</l>
          <r>xa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- barbun; b; 3 -->
    <pardef n="b/arbun__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arbun</l>
          <r>arbun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>raban</l>
          <r>arbun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>raben</l>
          <r>arbun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- bandiera; b; 2 -->
    <pardef n="b/andiera__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>andiera</l>
          <r>andiera<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nadar</l>
          <r>andiera<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- stilla; stil; 2 -->
    <pardef n="stil/la__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>la<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>la<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="tertuqa"><i>t</i><par n="t/ertuqa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="isfar"><i></i><par n="/isfar__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sined"><i>s</i><par n="s/ined__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ġebla"><i>ġeb</i><par n="ġeb/la__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="blokka"><i>blok</i><par n="blok/ka__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="balla"><i>bal</i><par n="bal/la__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="bodbod"><i>b</i><par n="b/odbod__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħalla"><i>ħal</i><par n="ħal/la__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="mazza"><i>maz</i><par n="maz/za__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ponta"><i>pon</i><par n="pon/ta__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="musmar"><i>m</i><par n="m/usmar__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="dorbies"><i>d</i><par n="d/orbies__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="zalza"><i>z</i><par n="z/alza__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="troffa"><i>tr</i><par n="tr/offa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="pinta"><i>pin</i><par n="pin/ta__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="palla"><i>pal</i><par n="pal/la__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="btala"><i>bta</i><par n="bta/la__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qallut"><i>q</i><par n="q/allut__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċenċiela"><i>ċe</i><par n="ċe/nċiela__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="reġina"><i>r</i><par n="r/eġina__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="kaxxa"><i>kax</i><par n="kax/xa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="barbun"><i>b</i><par n="b/arbun__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="bandiera"><i>b</i><par n="b/andiera__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="stilla"><i>stil</i><par n="stil/la__n_GD"/></e>
